Florida, session 2026, HB1259.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 420.0007, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
420.0007 First-time Homebuyer Assistance Program Trust
Fund.—
(1) There is established in the State Treasury a separate
trust fund to be named the "First-time Homebuyer Assistance
Program Trust Fund." The Department of Revenue shall transfer
all funds received pursuant to s. 201.0202 to the trust fund.
The trust fund shall be used to provide funding for the First-
time Homebuyer Assistance Program created in s. 420.5086.
(2) In accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State
Constitution, the First-time Homebuyer Assistance Program Trust
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1259-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1259 2026
Fund shall, unless terminated sooner, be terminated on July 1,
2030. Before its scheduled termination, the trust fund shall be
reviewed as provided in s. 215.3206(1) and (2).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026 but
only if HB 1257 or similar legislation is adopted in the same
legislative session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1259-00